Georgia, session 2025_26, HB926.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF GEORGIA:
SECTION 1.
Chapter 1 of Title 28 of the Official Code of Georgia Annotated, relating to general
provisions relative to the General Assembly, is amended by revising subsection (a) of Code
Section 28-1-4, relating to form and administration of oath of office to members, as follows:
"(a) In addition to any other oath prescribed by law, each Senator and Representative,
before taking the seat to which elected, shall take the following oath:
'I do hereby solemnly swear or affirm that I will support the Constitution of this state and
of the United States and, on all questions and measures which may come before me, I will
so conduct myself with civility, as will, in my judgment, be most conducive to the
interests and prosperity of this state.'"
H. B. 926
- 1 -

LC 59 0131
SECTION 2.
All laws and parts of laws in conflict with this Act are repealed.
H. B. 926
- 2 -